Vermont, session 2025-2026, H323.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Mental Health Innovation Special Fund * * *
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 7116 is added to read:
§ 7116. MENTAL HEALTH INNOVATION SPECIAL FUND
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 2 of 14
(a) There is created the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund, a special
fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5
and administered by the Department. The Mental Health Innovation Special
Fund shall consist of:
(1) all revenues raised by the Department of Taxes pursuant to 32
V.S.A. § 5862g; and
(2) monies received from public and private sources, including, gifts,
grants, donations, bequests, contributions of cash or securities, contributions of
property in kind from persons or governmental, nongovernmental, quasi-
governmental, or local government entities.
(b) Monies in the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund shall be utilized
exclusively for the mental health screening program established in 16 V.S.A.
§ 1433, the behavioral health innovation grant program established in section
7115 of this title, and any other program or service specified in statute.
(c) Revenues deposited in the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund that
are unexpended at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the General
Fund and shall be available for expenditure in the following fiscal year.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5862g is added to read:
§ 5862g. MENTAL HEALTH INNOVATION SPECIAL FUND CHECKOFF
(a) Returns filed by individuals shall include, on a form prescribed by the
Commissioner of Taxes, an opportunity for the taxpayer to designate funds to
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 3 of 14
the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund established under 18 V.S.A.
§ 7116.
(b) Amounts designated under subsection (a) of this section shall be
deducted from refunds due to, or overpayment made by, the designating
taxpayer. All amounts so designated and deducted shall be deposited in an
account by the Commissioner of Taxes for payment to the Mental Health
Innovation Special Fund. If at any time after the payment of amounts
designated to the account it is determined that the taxpayer was not entitled to
all or any part of the amount designated, the Commissioner may assess, and the
account shall then pay to the Commissioner, the amount received, together
with interest at the rate prescribed by section 3108 of this title, from the date
the payment was made until the date of repayment.
(c) The Commissioner of Taxes shall:
(1) explain to taxpayers the purpose of the Mental Health Innovation
Special Fund and how to contribute to it; and
(2) provide notice regarding how to obtain a copy of the annual income
and expense report for the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund.
(d) If amounts paid with respect to a return are insufficient to cover both
the amount owed on the return under this chapter and the amount designated as
a contribution to the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund, the payment shall
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 4 of 14
first be applied to the amount owed on the return under this chapter and the
balance, if any, shall be deposited in the Special Fund.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Commissioner
to collect any amount designated as a contribution to the Mental Health
Innovation Special Fund.
* * * Behavioral Health Innovation Grant Program * * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 7115 is added to read:
§ 7115. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INNOVATION GRANT PROGRAM
(a) To the extent funds permit, the Agency of Human Services shall
establish and administer a behavioral health innovation grant program to
support qualified care providers working in the mental health and substance
misuse treatment fields using available monies from the Mental Health
Innovation Special Fund established in section 7116 of this title. Grants issued
by the Agency in accordance with this section shall enhance innovation in the
workforce and foster quality improvements among qualified care providers.
(b) The Agency shall accept applications for a behavioral health innovation
grant in a format prescribed by the Agency in rule on a rolling basis beginning
on January 1, 2026. In awarding grants pursuant to this section, priority shall
be given to applications proposing to:
(1) develop or expand youth and school-based services;
(2) improve workforce development, training, and education;
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 5 of 14
(3) increase technical assistance to implement best practices;
(4) pilot promising, emerging best practices; or
(5) pilot workforce retention incentives.
(c) Annually on December 15, the Agency shall submit a report on the
expenditures of the behavioral health innovation grant program established in
this section to the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services
and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare. Specifically, the report
shall address:
(1) the revenue credited to the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund;
(2) the amount of fund expenditures attributable to administrative costs;
(3) an itemized list of the funds expended through the grant process and
a description of the grantee activities; and
(4) the effectiveness of the activities funded though the program
established in this section.
(d) The Agency shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for the
purpose of administering the program established in this section.
(e) As used in this section, “qualified care provider” means an individual
licensed as a psychologist pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 55, an individual
licensed as an alcohol and drug abuse counselor pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter
62, an individual licensed as a clinical mental health counselor pursuant to 26
V.S.A. chapter 65, an individual licensed as a psychoanalyst pursuant to 26
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 6 of 14
V.S.A. chapter 77, or an organization accredited by a national accrediting
entity to provide mental health or substance misuse treatment in the State.
Sec. 4. APPROPRIATION; BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INNOVATION
GRANT PROGRAM
In fiscal year 2026, $10,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund for
the behavioral health innovation grant program established in 18 V.S.A.
§ 7115. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the behavioral health
innovation grant program shall be funded by the Mental Health Innovation
Special Fund established in 18 V.S.A. § 7116 in future fiscal years.
* * * Mental Health and Substance Misuse Literacy * * *
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 914 is added to read:
§ 914. MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE MISUSE LITERACY
(a) The Agency of Education, in collaboration with the Departments of
Health and of Mental Health, shall select a curriculum to increase awareness
about mental health and substance misuse challenges facing youth throughout
the State. The curriculum shall include age-appropriate information on:
(1) the connection and importance of mental health to an individual’s
physical health and overall well-being;
(2) resources and tools for maintaining mental wellness, including
evidence-based practices used to overcome mental health and substance misuse
challenges;
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 7 of 14
(3) signs and symptoms of common mental health and substance misuse
challenges and strategies for responding to those signs and symptoms;
(4) the prevalence of mental health and substance misuse challenges
across all populations;
(5) common mental health and substance misuse conditions and
evidence-based treatments for common conditions; and
(6) how to seek assistance or support for a mental health or substance
misuse challenge in school and the community at large.
(b) The Agency shall post the selected mental health and substance misuse
curriculum on its website.
(c) The Agency shall distribute the curriculum to school districts, parents
and guardians, and organizations serving youth in the State.
* * * Mental Health Screening Program in Schools * * *
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 1433 is added to read:
§ 1433. MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING PROGRAM
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Agency” means the Agency of Education.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Mental Health.
(b) The Agency, in collaboration with the Department, shall develop and
administer a program authorizing each supervisory union to provide or arrange
for the provision of evidence-based mental health screening services within the
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 8 of 14
schools it oversees. The mental health screening services provided pursuant to
this section shall be approved by the Agency, in consultation with the
Department. Mental health screening services provided by a supervisory union
shall:
(1) be age appropriate for each grade served;
(2) screen for those mental health conditions determined by the Agency
in rule; and
(3) effectively identify whether a student has a mental health condition
requiring intervention or treatment.
(c) Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the State Board of Education, in
collaboration with the Department, shall adopt rules for the administration of
this program that address the following:
(1) the process for a supervisory union to notify the Agency of its
decision to participate in the mental health screening program;
(2) access to and use of a participating student’s screening data
consistent with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20
U.S.C. § 1232g and 34 C.F.R. part 99 (FERPA), and any relevant provisions of
State law;
(3) annual training requirements related to the mental health screening
program;
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 9 of 14
(4) specific mental health conditions that the mental health screening
services seek to identify; and
(5) the process and specific criteria for distribution of financial support
pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
(d) On or before July 1 of each year, a supervisory union shall notify the
Agency, in a manner specified in rule, as to whether the supervisory union
intends to participate in the mental health screening program for the following
academic year. A participating supervisory union shall:
(1) select and seek approval from the Department regarding the mental
health screening services it plans to offer as part of its participation in the
program;
(2) annually notify parents and guardians with a student in the
supervisory union that the parent or guardian may choose to have the student
screened for mental health conditions;
(3) obtain prior written consent from a student’s parent or guardian prior
to conducting a mental health screening in manner that complies with FERPA;
(4) provide or cause to be provided the approved mental health
screening services to participating students;
(5) notify parents and guardians of the results of a participating student’s
mental health screening;
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 10 of 14
(6) discuss resources with the parents and guardians of a participating
student who screens positive for a potential mental health condition; and
(7) use funds distributed by the Agency for expenses related to
participation in the program pursuant to subsection (e) of this section,
including services for certain students screening positive for a mental health
condition.
(e) To the extent funds permit, the Agency shall distribute funds
appropriated for this purpose from the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund
established in 18 V.S.A. § 7116 to supervisory unions participating in the
mental health screening program established in this section. Of the funds
available for the mental health screening program, 90 percent shall be
distributed to participating supervisory unions based on the previous year’s
average daily membership count and 10 percent shall be available as needed to
participating supervisory unions that have exhausted other funds distributed for
this purpose. Funds distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be used to
fund mental health screening services, trainings for school personnel, and for
those services recommended to a student screening positive for a potential
mental health condition when a parent or guardian does not have the financial
resources to provide the recommended services.
(f) A school employee receiving training pursuant to this chapter shall be
immune from civil or criminal liability with regard to mental health screening
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 11 of 14
services, unless the employee’s actions constituted recklessness, gross
negligence, or intentional misconduct.
(g) Annually on July 1, the Agency, in collaboration with the Department,
shall submit a report to the House Committee on Health Care and to the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare describing:
(1) the number of participating students who received a mental health
screening pursuant to this section during the previous school year;
(2) the number of participating students referred to additional services or
for whom intervention was required;
(3) how funds distributed to participating supervisory unions were used;
and
(4) whether the distributed funds were sufficient to meet supervisory
union needs under this section.
Sec. 7. APPROPRIATION; MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING PROGRAM
In fiscal year 2026, $10,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund for
the mental health screening program established in 16 V.S.A. § 1433. It is the
intent of the General Assembly that the mental health screening program shall
be funded by the Mental Health Innovation Special Fund established in 18
V.S.A. § 7116 in future fiscal years.
* * * Peer-to-Peer Mental Health Support in Schools * * *
Sec. 8. PEER-TO-PEER MENTAL HEALTH SUPPORT PROGRAM
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 12 of 14
(a) The Agency of Education, in collaboration with the Department of
Mental Health, shall establish a four-year pilot program for the distribution of
grants that fund peer-to-peer mental health support programs in public and
approved independent schools. Peer-to-peer mental health support programs
shall enable students to provide and receive peer support and coaching from
other students in relation to mental health challenges. Each program shall have
the oversight of a certified peer support provider and guidance from a school-
based mental health service provider.
(b) The Agency of Education shall accept grant applications for peer-to-
peer mental health services programs on a rolling basis beginning on August 1,
2026. In awarding grants pursuant to this section, priority shall be given to
applications submitted by a public or an approved independent school that:
(1) propose using the grant for a peer-to-peer mental health program
with a suicide prevention component; or
(2) are located in an area of the State that has high rates of suicide or has
experienced a recent traumatic event.
(c) Certified peer support specialists and school employees assisting with a
peer-to-peer mental health support program that is awarded a grant pursuant to
this section shall receive training in the following:
(1) empathetic listening;
(2) enhancing protective mental health factors;
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 13 of 14
(3) recognizing and appropriately responding to risk factors and warning
signs associated with mental health and substance misuse challenges, including
co-occurring challenges;
(4) connecting students with professional mental health services and
recovery supports, as necessary; and
(5) any other areas included in the National Model Standards for Peer
Support Certification of Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services
Administration.
(d) On or before January 1, 2030, the Agency of Education, in
collaboration with the Department of Mental Health, shall submit a report to
the House Committee on Health Care and to the Senate Committee on Health
and Welfare evaluating the efficacy of the program, including:
(1) student participation in the program;
(2) the efficacy of the training provided to participating certified peer
support specialists and school employees assisting with the program;
(3) the percentage of students participating in the program who reported
improved mental health outcomes; and
(4) the number of participating students connected with professional
mental services due to program participation.
VT LEG #380239 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.323
2025 Page 14 of 14
(e) In fiscal year 2027, $10,000.00 is appropriated from the Mental Health
Innovation Special Fund established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7116 to fund the
grants awarded pursuant to this section.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380239 v.1